Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.410.025

Qualifications—Certificate or permit required.

No person shall be accounted as a qualified teacher within the meaning of the school law who is not the holder of a valid teacher's certificate or permit issued by lawful authority of this state.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.67.010. Prior: 1909 c 97 p 306 s 1; RRS s 4844; prior: 1907 c 240 s 6; 1897 c 118 s 51; 1891 c 127 s 14; 1890 p 369 s 37; 1886 p 18 s 47; 1873 p 430 s 15. Formerly RCW 28A.405.010, 28A.67.010, 28.67.010.]